Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4374.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 216C.441, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. General powers. (a) For the purpose of exercising the specific powers granted in this section, the authority has the general powers granted in this subdivision. (b) The authority may: (1) hire an executive director and staff to conduct the authority's operations; (2) sue and be sued; (3) have a seal and alter the seal; (4) acquire, hold, lease, manage, and dispose of real or personal property for the authority's corporate purposes; (5) enter into agreements, including cooperative financing agreements, contracts, or other transactions, with a Tribal government, any federal or state agency, county, local unit of government, regional development commission, person, domestic or foreign partnership, corporation, association, or organization; (6) acquire by purchase real property, or an interest therein, in the authority's own name where acquisition is necessary or appropriate; (7) provide general technical and consultative services related to the authority's purpose; (8) promote research and development in matters related to the authority's purpose; (9) conduct market analysis to determine where the market is underserved; (10) analyze greenhouse gas emissions reduction project financing needs in the state and recommend measures to alleviate any shortage of financing capacity; (11) contract with any governmental or private agency or organization, legal counsel, financial advisor, investment banker, or others to assist in the exercise of the authority's powers; (12) enter into agreements with qualified lenders or others insuring or guaranteeing to the state the payment of qualified loans or other financing instruments; and (13) accept on behalf of the state any gift, grant, or interest in money or personal property tendered to the state for any purpose pertaining to the authority's activities.new text begin Money received under this clause must be deposited in the account under subdivision 11.new text end